Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 2

Security Units

33-7-201. Creation of forensic services units.

The commissioner shall operate in the state hospitals secure facilities, known as forensic services units, necessary for persons with mental illness who are eligible for admission to the units under this title.

Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-701; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 35; 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 7, §§ 33-7-101 — 33-7-103, 33-7-201 — 33-7-203, 33-7-301 — 33-7-303 (Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 22, 26, 27; 1977, ch. 386, § 1; 1979, ch. 311, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 224, § 17; 1982, ch. 862, § 12; 1983, ch. 323, § 23; T.C.A., §§ 33-701, 33-704, 33-708, 33-709 33-711 — 33-715; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 35-38; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 26-28; 1987, ch. 143, § 4; 1998, ch. 978, §§ 1, 2), is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

33-7-202. Initiation of commitment proceedings — Findings required.

If the commissioner authorizes the transfer of a voluntary service recipient with mental illness to a forensic services unit, the chief officer of the receiving facility shall initiate commitment proceedings under chapter 6, part 5 of this title.

In the proceedings the court shall determine, in addition to the findings required by chapter 6, part 5 of this title, whether the service recipient is substantially likely to injure the person or others if not treated in a forensic services unit and whether treatment in a forensic services unit is in the person's best interest.

Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 22; T.C.A., § 33-704; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 36; 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-7-203. Discharge from forensic services unit.

When a person in a forensic services unit no longer meets the standards under which the person was admitted to the unit, the chief officer shall cause the person to be discharged or to be returned to the hospital, division or facility from which the person was transferred or to be transferred to another appropriate facility or program.

Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-711; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Federal Procedure — Statutory Construction — Meaning of “Mentally Incompetent,” 6 Vand. L. Rev. 928 (1953).

Collateral References.

Amnesia as affecting capacity to commit crime or stand trial. 46 A.L.R.3d 544.